Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Chapter 90. Alaska Gasline Inducement Act.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent regarding expedited court consideration of a case relating to the development and construction of a natural gas pipeline under this chapter, see § 7, ch. 22, SLA 2007, in the 2007 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 8, ch. 22, SLA 2007 explicitly declares that the provisions of the Act, which enacted this chapter, are subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 22, SLA 2007 (HB 177), proposing and describing the purposes of the Alaska Gasline Inducement Act, see 2007 House Journal 384 — 389.